South Dakota, session 2026, HB1198.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 11-2:
The operator of a proposed high energy use facility must apply for a conditional
use permit from a county adjacent to the political subdivision in which the facility is located
if:
(1) The facility is located within one mile of the boundary of the adjacent county; and
(2) The adjacent county has adopted zoning ordinances or a special zoning area.
For purposes of this section, "high energy use facility" means one or more buildings
located on a single parcel, or multiple contiguous parcels, with an anticipated combined
utility demand plus facility generated power of twenty megawatts or more of average
electrical power.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 11-4:
The operator of a proposed high energy use facility, as defined in section 1 of this
Act, must apply for a conditional use permit from a municipality adjacent to the political
subdivision in which the facility is located if:
(1) The facility is located within one mile of the boundary of the adjacent municipality;
and
(2) The adjacent municipality has adopted zoning ordinances.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.